Montana, session 2025, HB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-5-131, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-5-131. Process for delisting of gray wolf -- management following delisting. (1) If the United
States fish and wildlife service removes the Northern Rocky Mountain or gray wolf from the United States' list of
endangered or threatened wildlife, the department is authorized to remove the wolf from the state list of
endangered species upon on a determination by the department pursuant to this part that the wolf is no longer
endangered.
(2) Following state delisting of the wolf, the department shall manage the wolf as a species in need
of management. until the department and the commission determine that the wolf no longer needs protection as
a species in need of management and can be managed and protected as a game animal or furbearer. Upon
making that determination, the commission may declare the wolf a game animal or a furbearer and may
regulate the taking of a wolf as a game animal or furbearer.
(3) (a) Following state delisting of the wolf, the department, or the department of livestock,
pursuant to 81-7-102 and 81-7-103, may control wolves for the protection and safeguarding of livestock if the
control action is consistent with a wolf management plan approved by both the department and the department
of livestock.
(b) Any wolf management plan approved by the department and the department of livestock must
allow the issuance of special kill permits, also known as shoot-on-sight written take authorizations, by the
department to landowners or public land permittees who have experienced livestock depredation."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 554
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 554
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 554
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 554, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 554
INTRODUCED BY B. LER, W. GALT, L. SCHUBERT, K. LOVE, G. OVERSTREET, C. SCHOMER, C.
COCHRAN, M. THIEL, E. TILLEMAN, M. CUFFE, J. FULLER, R. MARSHALL, L. DEMING, P. FIELDER, S.
MANESS, J. HINKLE
AN ACT REMOVING THE REQUIREMENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS
MANAGE, PROTECT, CLASSIFY, OR REGULATE WOLVES AS GAME ANIMALS OR FURBEARERS; AND
AMENDING SECTION 87-5-131, MCA.”